Maine, session 132, LD2038.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3133-B is enacted to read:
§3133-B. Mandatory participation in regional transmission organization
1. Regional transmission organization; definition. For the purposes of this section,
"regional transmission organization" has the same meaning as in section 10102, subsection
8.
2. Participation mandatory. Except as provided in subsection 3, a transmission and
distribution utility may not own or control a transmission and distribution plant located in
the State unless the transmission and distribution utility participates in a regional
transmission organization.
3. Exceptions. The provisions of this section do not apply to:
A. A consumer-owned transmission and distribution utility as defined in section 3501,
subsection 1; or
B. A transmission and distribution utility that owns or controls a transmission and
distribution plant located in an area of this State in which the retail electricity market
is administered by the independent system administrator for northern Maine.
Page 1 - 132LR2638(06)